test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-hurskes_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Adjective - hurskes: # 2A A_VEESKIR
    hurskes+A+Sg+Nom: hurskes
    hurskes+A+Sg+Gen: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Acc: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Ill: hurskásân
    hurskes+A+Sg+Loc: hurskásist
    hurskes+A+Sg+Com: hurskásáin
    hurskes+A+Sg+Abe: hurskásttáá
    hurskes+A+Ess:    hurskesin
    hurskes+A+Par:    hurskesid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Nom: hurskáseh
    hurskes+A+Pl+Gen: hurskásij
    hurskes+A+Pl+Acc: hurskásijd
    hurskes+A+Pl+Ill: hurskásáid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Loc: hurskásijn
    hurskes+A+Pl+Com: hurskásijguin
    hurskes+A+Pl+Abe: hurskásijttáá
